src-fst-phonetics-txt2ipa.xfscript.md
Phonological converter for Faroese
==================================

Table below taken from:
> Standardising Pronunciation for a Grapheme-to-Phoneme Converter for Faroese

## FARSAMPA/IPA table

| Phoneme class| Orthography  | FARSAMPA | IPA |
|:------------ |:------------ |:-------- |:--- |
| Stops        | p            | p        | pʰ  |
|              | b            | b        | p   |
|              | t            | t        | tʰ  |
|              | d            | d        | t   |
|              | k            | k        | kʰ  |
|              | g            | g        | k   |
| Fricatives   | f            | f        | f   |
|              | v            | v        | v   |
|              | ?            | 4        | ð   |
|              | ?            | 5        | θ   |
|              | s            | s        | s   |
|              | s            | S        | ʃ   |
|              | ?            | z        | ʂ   |
|              | h            | h        | h   |
| Affricates   | b            | tS       | tʃʰ |
|              | b            | dZ       | tʃ  |
| Nasals       | m            | m        | m   |
|              | m            | M        | m̥   |
|              | n            | n        | n   |
|              | n            | x        | n̥   |
|              | n            | N        | ŋ   |
|              | n            | X        | ŋ̊   |
| Laterals     | l            | l        | l   |
|              | l            | L        | l̥   |
| Approximants | ð            | w        | w   |
|              | ð            | j        | j   |
|              | r            | r        | ɹ   |
| Monophthongs | i            | i        | i   |
|              | i?           | I        | ɪ   |
|              | e            | e        | e   |
|              | e?           | E        | ɛ   |
|              | a            | a        | a   |
|              | y            | y        | y   |
|              | ?            | Y        | ʏ   |
|              | ø            | 2        | ø   |
|              | ?            | 9        | œ   |
|              | ú?           | u        | u   |
|              | ?            | U        | ʊ   |
|              | ?            | o        | o   |
|              | ?            | O        | ɔ   |
|              | ?            | 8        | ə   |
| Diphthongs   | æ?           | EA       | ɛa  |
|              | á            | OA       | ɔa  |
|              | oy           | OJ       | ʊi  |
|              | ?            | UJ       | ɛi  |
|              | ei           | EJ       | ai  |
|              | ei?          | aJ       | ai  |
|              | ?            | aW       | au  |
|              | ?            | OJ       | ɔi  |
|              | ?            | OW       | ɔu  |
|              | ?            | 3W       | ʉu  |
|              | ?            | EW       | ɛu  |
|              | ?            | 9W       | œu  |
|              | ?            | 9J       | œi  |
| Diacritics   | ?            | H        | ʰ   |
| Others       | (length)     | :        | ː   |
|              | (prim. stress| %        | ˈ   |
|              | (sec. stress)| ~        | ˌ   |

# For reference: The SAMPA - IPA correspondence

| SAMPA   |  IPA  |  Description
| ------- | ----- | ------------
| p       |  p    |  voiceless bilabial stop
| b       |  b    |  voiced bilabial stop
| t       |  t    |  voiceless alveolar or dental stop
| d       |  d    |  voiced alveolar or dental stop
| ts      |  ʦ    |  voiceless alveolar affricate
| dz      |  ʣ    |  voiced alveolar affricate
| tS      |  ʧ    |  voiceless postalveolar affricate
| dZ      |  ʤ    |  voiced postalveolar affricate
| c       |  c    |  voiceless palatal stop
| J\      |  ɟ    |  (overstroked j)    voiced palatal stop
| k       |  k    |  voiceless velar stop
| g       |  g    |  voiced velar stop
| q       |  q    |  voiceless uvular stop
| p\      |  ɸ    |  (Greek phi)    voiceless bilabial fricative
| B       |  β    |  (Greek beta)    voiced bilabial fricative
|         |  ϐ    |  (Greek beta alt)    voiced bilabial approximant
| f       |  f    |  voiceless labiodental fricative
| v       |  v    |  voiced labiodental fricative
| T       |  θ    |  (Greek theta)    voiceless dental fricative
|         |  ϑ    |  (Greek theta alt)    voiceless dental approximant
| D       |  ð    |  (Icelandic eth)    voiced dental fricative
|         |  δ    |  (Greek delta)    voiced dental approximant
| s       |  s    |  voiceless alveolar fricative
| z       |  z    |  voiced alveolar fricative
| S       |  ʃ    |  voiceless postalveolar fricative
| Z       |  ʒ    |  voiced postalveolar fricative
| C       |  ç    |  (cedilla)    voiceless palatal fricative
| j\ (jj) |  ʝ    |  (j with crossed tail)    voiced palatal fricative
| x       |  x    |  voiceless velar fricative
| G       |  γ    |  (Greek gamma)    voiced velar fricative
|         |  ɰ    |  voiced velar approximant
| X\      |  ħ    |  (overstroked h)    voiceless pharyngeal fricative
| ?\      |  ʕ    |  (Inverted ?)    voiced pharyngeal fricative
| h       |  h    |  voiceless glottal approximant
| h\      |  ɦ    |  (h with upper tail to the right)    voiced glottal approximant
| m       |  m    |  bilabial nasal
| F       |  ɱ    |  (m with downward right tail)    labiodental nasal
| n       |  n    |  alveolar or dental nasal
| J       |  ɲ    |  (n with downward left tail)    palatal nasal
| N       |  ŋ    |  (n with downward right tail)    velar nasal
| l       |  l    |  alveolar lateral
| L       |  ʎ    |  turned down y, alt. λ (Greek lambda)    palatal lateral
| 5       |  ɫ    |  (l with middle tilde)    velarized dental lateral
| 4 (r)   |  ɾ    |  (r without upper-left serif)    alveolar flap
| r (rr)  |  r    |  alveolar trill
| r\      |  ɹ    |  (r rotated 180°)    retroflexed alveolar approximant
| R       |  ʀ    |  (small capital R)    uvular trill
| P       |  ʋ    |  labiodental approximant
| w       |  w    |  velo-labial approximant
| H       |  ɥ    |  (turned down h)    palato-labial approximant
| j       |  j    |  palatal approximant

## Vowels
```
.             front   near-front    central   near-back   back
close          i • y               1 • }                 M • u
near-close              I • Y                    U
close-mid      e • 2              @\ • 8                 7 • o
mid                                  @            
open-mid       E • 9               3 • 3\                V • O
near-open        {                    6           
open           a • &                                     A • Q
```

## More SAMPA/IPA documentation

(Some symbols are doubled or escaped with \ in the source to escape Markdown (mis)interpretation, they will appear correct in the rendered HTML.)
